Authors
Fontaine Lien
Number of Reviews
27

Title
Review for Vita č bella, La (1997)
"In the game we are all players.  It's all organized."
It's true for me (and for many other critics) that the less I have to
say about a movie, the better it is.   One thing I'll have to say, though, is
this movie didn't wasn't as good as I expected it to be; maybe I've heard
too many good things about this movie beforehand.  In it, we find
something beautiful, exotic, sad; the same something we find in every
movie that features another tongue and foreign soil.  The distinct, anti-
Hollywood glamour movie that almost inevitably receives a nod for
Outstanding Foreign Movie at the Oscars. I'm not trying to downplay the
quality of this film; it's just that it seems we're all too ready to embrace
these type of movies these days just because of what they are.  It's
because of this reason that I label "Life is Beautiful" as something less
than "excellent."
That aside, "Life" had all the makings of a good anti-Holocaust movie.  The
bittersweet memories are there, the horror is there, the pathos is there. 
Roberto Benigni's character is carefree, reckless, mischievous, yet good
natured and every bit the loving father and husband.  Benigni's
performance is stellar, and it's the gradual destruction of this
uninhibited, innocent soul that is at the core of the movie's message.  He
did everything he could to save his family, he laughed in the face of death
and persecution, but fate destroyed him anyway.  How cruel is destiny,
how ruthless the German Nazi's, that even a man of such tenacity can be
broken?  Because we've gotten to know this adorable family so well--
from the anecdotes of the courtship and the education of the little boy
Joshua which provide some extremely funny moments--the deaths seem
all the more tragic, the survival all the more bittersweet.  
It's equally marvelous that we not only see the story of this family, we
see aspects of each part of the human spectrum, each part that's part of
what makes life "beautiful," through good times, bad times, and war
times.  Suffice to say that our hero did not die in vain.  

Title
Review for Thomas Crown Affair, The (1999)
Okay, I admit.  I had high expectations.  My friend Jody saw it twice
already, and she said she'd see it with me again, and not just because
of Pierce Brosnan's most excellent behind.  I was disappointed (geez,
that just seems to be my way of life lately after "Star Wars Episode
I: The Phantom Menace" and "Blair Witch Project"), but I'm happy to
say not overly so.  I was only bored for a few minutes, and I thought
Rene Russo's breasts showed up on screen just a *tad* too often.
Another problem I had was with Pierce Brosnan's Thomas Crown.  Sure,
he's rich, suave, handsome, intelligent, and whatnot (heck, I think
Mr.  Crown the finance geek secretly fantasizes about being James
Bond), but I'd like to see more of his motives.  Sure, there was
foreshadowing: he'd take on a bet of 100,000 dollars without so much
as a batting an eyelash; he'd ruin a boat just for thrills.  But when
I ask myself why on earth a millionaire like him would go to such
lengths to steal a painting only to return it, I can't come up with a
satisfactory answer.  Other than creative license.  I probably would
have enjoyed Crown's slick maneuvers a lot more if that one thought
hadn't kept bugging me.
I also how he could've fallen in love with a woman like Catherine
Banning (played by Rene "I'm forty but I've still got a nice body"
Russo) so quickly.  I mean it's not like it's a case of opposites
attract.  It didn't feel right.  Banning seemed just a little too
smug, just a little too self-assured.  I suppose Russo's nose had
something to do with that impression, but who am I to judge on
someone's appearance?  I didn't like it and I can't come up with a
legitimate reason why.  However I did like how Russo gradually showed
us the fragile feminine Banning under the tough act she puts up.  When
Crown "returns" the painting to the museum, we see some priceless
moments in the surveillance room as Banning tries to hide joy then
disappointment at Crown's escape.
"The Thomas Crown Affair" was like a sightseeing tour of the New York
area with our brilliant and attractive fourty-something stars.  The
scenery and cinematography were just breathtaking, and the score added
a lot of class.  It's tempting to label the film as all style and no
substance, because there *is* too much socializing and contrived
romance and too little action, but when one thinks about it: Well, the
word "affair" *does* have two meanings.  I'm just glad that our two
lovebirds stayed in love (proving that, hey, even rich spoiled bored
people can find true love) and we all found a tiny moral lesson (as
Dennis Leary's Michael did) along the way.

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
Well don't I feel like a dumb butt now.  Back then when "The Sixth
Sense" trailers started appearing in theaters, I was skeptical.  It
looked like just another "Mercury Rising," and clips of Bruce Willis
staring off into space and that oh so skillful delivery of "I see dead
people" by Haley Joel Osmont (wonder boy of the year) really turned me
off to the movie.  Then whaddya know, it became a hit, and everyone
started talking about it; yet I stubbornly refused to see it.  Well sue
me for being suspicious about a Bruce Willis flick.  Thus is the saga of
how one afternoon I asked my friend to just tell me what the ending was
that everyone was so excited over.
I didn't know that I would have decided to see it one year later at a
school event.  And let me tell ya, I really wish I hadn't found out
about the surprise ending before I saw the movie.  I probably would have
enjoyed it a lot more.  That's not to say I didn't find "Sense" a
refreshing counterpoint to slasher flicks like "Scream 3," which I
enjoyed equally as much for a different reason.  If I had to pick one
word to describe "Sixth Sense" it would be "intense." The film exudes
quiet intensity for all of its, what, 110 minutes?  From beginning to
end, never a moment that wasn't unsettling.  I credit this to the set
designers and lighting people, who arranged the setting so that it
almost seems painted with a tangible, morbid gray; yet like some hideous
creature that hides in the light, we are unable to point out what
exactly about the sunny streets of Philadelphia is frightening us and
filling us with dread.  All this is nice complimented by the score by
James Newton Howard, who seems to have been taking quite a few notes
from Mark Snow.  The camera sulks stealthily from situation to
situation; and with the aid of fade ins and outs we feel like we're
watching the fragments of Malcolm's (Bruce Willis) life torn asunder. 
The effect is an eery film that quietly creeps up on you unlike other
horror films; yet it is different from "The Blair Witch Project" in that
it *does* show us the ghosts, sometimes with maybe too much flair on the
part of the director.  That we could have done without.  Otherwise the
film manages to spook us out without grossing us out too much; some
great moments include Cole (Osmont) banging on the attic door at a
friend's party and the video tape viewing at the funeral service. 
Moments like these
manage to send shivers down our spine without using too much blood and
gore.  I give points for that.  
Aside from Bruce Willis, who was probably chosen for his star power
rather than
suitability to the role, the few characters in this film were all
wonderfully cast.  Olivia Williams is sympathetic as the pale, sorrowful
widow (she seems born to play the pale sorrowful widow), and Toni
Collette is subtle as a young woman, seemingly barely in her twenties,
who doesn't seem to quite know how to handle motherhood, two jobs, and
the loss of a parent at the same time.  And Haley, Haley, Haley.  I'm
sorry for underestimating you.  Turns out you might give Jonathan
Lipnicki a run for his money.  As a child who is naturally adorable (and
you can see that sometimes, during the rare instances when Cole smiles
in the film), you gotta give the kid credit
for walking around convincingly frightened and stubborn throughout the
majority of the movie. When he delivers his lines, you want to inch
closer to the screen to hear the child speak.  When he is cowering in
fear, we feel part of ourselves huddle along with him in fear of
something WE ourselves fear the most.  Whatever it is must be dreadful. 
He is so frail that if you reach out you are afraid that you're going to
break him.  Yet when he speaks, you listen.  That's how good Haley was. 
And no, not even Bruce Willis was half bad.
Now "Sense" left a lot of things unexplained, such as just why the
ghosts do not realize they're dead (I mean, heck, what do they EAT?  And
don't they notice that everyone's ignoring them?), why didn't Anna
(Olivia Williams) just dial 911 for God's sake, how one little kid is
supposed to serve as the principal complaint bureau for the entire
underworld population, how DUMB can a doctor in child's psychology be in
not figuring out why his wife is depressed, and why aren't there any
evil ghosts?  However I am willing to give the film some leeway because
in not striving to give everything a LOGICAL explanation, it gives
everything an EMOTIONAL explanation.  That's why we believe that when
Cole gives his mother the message from Grandma,
we believe everything's going to be okay.   We believe that when Malcolm
finally realizes the truth about his existence, everything's going to be
okay.  I loved how even though the film was hawked as something that
would scare the poop out of people by showcasing the supernatural, it
snuck in jabs at humanity as well.  Even barely-there characters such as
the befuddled, agitated school teacher, the nonchalant parents of the
other children, Anna's young, inexperienced suitor, and the deceiving
(step?)mother at the funeral register in our minds as painfully
realistic reflections of everyday walks of life.  They were supposed to
make us scream, but they made us cry instead.
We were fooled.  Up until eighty percent of the movie, we thought we
were watching a
thriller/horror flick; with the last ten or fifteen minutes or so the
film does a sudden turn around and points out to us the theme that was
there along: humanity.  Sometimes ugly, but mostly marvelous (this time,
anyway) humanity.  We survived the transition from horror to drama, and
we're okay. The whole thing was strangely cathartic.

Title
Review for Playing by Heart (1998)
"Talking about love is like dancing about architecture."
"Playing by Heart" is movie with a very cute and promising premise: four
couples, seemingly unrelated, each deal with their relationship problems. 
In the end, it is discovered that they're all connected in some way.  Here's
a plot that's refreshing, somewhat original, and has a potential for
greatness.  For once, a movie has more *dialogue* than it has special
effects and gratuitous nudity.  But "Playing" is a few olives short of a
vodka martini.  
The least they could have done was keep us interested in the characters
long enough for the big "surprise" at the end, which the preview for the
movie all but gave away, so I was probably at a disadvantage.  Being
mysterious is fine, but you've got to have enough punch to keep the movie
running at a fair pace.  A damn shame, because aside from a few subtle
hints like "angerball," there really wasn't anything that gave the ending
away.
Of all the couples, only Angelina Jolie and Ryan Philippe's Joan and Keenan
have really grabbed my attention.  Even though Philippe was stiff as a
stick and Jolie didn't really "grow into" her character until the movie was
well underway.  And even then it felt like they were reciting their lines. 
But at any rate, the characters were the most developed: Here's a guy who
seems to have a lot of emotional baggage hidden inside, and a girl who's
very unabashed about expressing her feelings. I found myself wondering
whatever happened to Keenan, and whether this odd couple would ever get
together (whether I thought they were right for each other, on the other
hand, is an entirely different matter).  In contrast, I didn't really care for
the other couples.  Jon Stewart's Trent was played and written as a slick,
unlikable sleazebag, and Gillian Anderson's Meredith was a character who
developed solely out of her past (her unhappy marriage with Jay Mohr's
Mark, which we will deal with later).  Throughout the whole courtship the
problem was that Meredith supposedly had too many walls around her;
well, those walls came tumbling down a little too soon, too conveniently. 
Gillian Anderson's mellow, stoic performance as Meredith once again
confirmed my suspicion that she's most cut out for the role of Dana
Scully.   Or was it because Meredith was too similar to Scully?  I hope it
is the latter.  I never really understood Madeline Stowe / Anthony Edwards
/ Dennis Quaid triangle, partly because the film didn't take enough time to
explain their relationship.  The same with Sean Connery and Gena
Rowlands.  I'm not saying that the explanation was incomplete, or the
characters any less deserving of sympathy--but that we were given too
little to go on.  We've just gotten to know these characters at a certain
turning point in their lives, and it's just too bad that we aren't given the
chance to get more acquainted with them.  The whole other sideline with
Jay Mohr and Ellen Burstyn seemed unnecessary; sure, it made for a great
story, contributed a few good scenes, gave a few surprises at the end, but
it had nothing to do with the theme of the movie (dancing about
architecture, so to speak).  All in all, it was disappointing that only two
of the eight main characters succeeded in "being"; the rest in comparison
seemed like mere paper dolls cut out to serve the story's purpose.  Part of
the reason is because they were played with so little conviction: a well-
developed character needs good lines, good scenarios, and a good actor;
here the dialogue seemed to shoulder too much of the burden.  We were
constantly being hit over-the-head with monologues about the character's
problems, without a lot of acting to back it up.  The big obstacle: making
the characters three-dimensional before the big revelation deadline.  It
doesn't matter if a particular stage of the development was too hasty, we
have to move on because they all need to be happily together by the end of
two hours.  It's a shame to see how often an assembly of great actors go
to waste.
It might be confusing if I said that what could have made this story more
interesting is where the movie failed.  The premise was great: brief
glimpses into the lives of couples that we run into almost everyday,
gradually getting to know these couples, then reaching some sort of a
conclusion.  However, everything seemed to work against it. The snippets
started to become annoying when after each one we felt confused and
apathetic rather than interested.  There were a few scenes that were
noteworthy, but the movie as a whole seemed disjointed.  I don't want to
discourage the obviously very talented writer of this story by saying
(*snort*, like he'll ever read this) this, but I think the movie could have
been better with a few fix-ups.  As much as I rant about my disappoint,
the movie was satisfying in its attempt at deciphering the world of love
and make us sigh with contentment with its sappy-sweet ending.
"You can't treat people like you treat people and then say something
adorable like that."
*Highlight: Gillian Anderson giving Sean Connery a kiss.  Wasn't that
wonderful?
*The disgusting toothpaste kiss.  Ugh.
*"My mind has an endless capacity for useless information." -- Dude,
sounds like me.

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
        Another misleading theatrical trailor led me to believe that this
film would primarily be about the two main character's courtship via the
internet, with them finally meeting each other during the last five
minutes of the movie.  Meeting as in finally revealing their identities to
each other.  Tom Hanks's Joe Fox finding out that his online love is his real
life rival so early was as shocking to me as "Psycho's" Marion Crane dying
20 minutes or so into the movie.  Well, maybe I exaggerate, but to me this
is where "You've Got Mail" worked.  With clever writing, the Ephron
sisters shrewdly avoided having the movie turn into just another
"Sleepless In Seattle" clone.  This way, Joe gets a chance to find out
another side of Kathleen Kelly's (Meg Ryan's) persona that she does not
reveal in cyberspace.  If he hadn't know the "shopgirl" side of Kathleen,
Joe would not have understood that Kathleen's biting words were just an
effort of defiance; if Joe's "NY152" alter-ego hadn't found out that
Kathleen IRL (In Real Life, in cyberspeak ) was such a charming, funny
woman, he might never have fallen in love with her completely.   Another
bonus is that we get acquainted with two sides of Joe Fox.  On one side we
get the ruthless millionaire who sees everyone and everything as
competition, who will stop at nothing to destroy his enemies; when we sit
down with Joe at the computer, we see someone trapped in a hopeless
relationship, someone who is sympathetic to the underdog.  One side he's
flippant, reckless; on the other he's honest, serious.  As much as we would
like to hate Joe Fox for his lack of mercy, as hard as it may be to
reconcile his two personalities, we have to: I do, since I too have a side of
myself that I despise.  This movie demonstrates the best possible outcome
of an internet romance -- when you know someone inside        *and* out.
        "You've Got Mail" is merry, seasonal, spiced up with a jazzy
soundtrack that puts you at once in a romantic mood.  Albeit slow at times
and filled with sidetrackers (for example, I had not expected them to
delve so much into Kathleen's faltering business; I have no complaints,
though, since one of my favorite scenes from the movie stems from this
storyline - the memory sequence of Kathleen dancing with her mother in
the store.  Amazing score here), the film is satisfying.  Tom Hanks and Meg
Ryan get my vote as the cutest couple of the year, and though both are
wonderful in their roles, I'd have to say Tom wins my heart with his funny
mannerisms and expressions.  This guy *does* deserve two academy
awards (and another one coming next year?).  I also enjoyed Parker Posey
and Greg Kinnear's wickedly annoying performances as the ex-boyfriend
and ex-girlfriend.  With a whimsical script and a playful score, "You've
Got Mail" is the Very Hollywood feel-good answer to all the cynicism we
see in our country right now.  
* Kudos for the lovely opening sequence.  The dark colors created a lonely,
impersonal atmosphere; yet cyberspace never looked so amiable.

Title
Review for Romeo Must Die (2000)
        At first viewing, `Romeo Must Die,' with its curious mix of patented
Jet Li martial arts, Hollywood special effects and especially
ineffective plotline and characterization, and non-stop hit hip hop
music soundtrack, was almost too hard for me to digest.  I felt guilty
for enjoying this brainless popcorn film, because I knew the screenplay
left much to be desired, that the action scenes showcased Li's talent
but also left a lingering sense of craving for more, that Li deserved,
in his first starring vehicle, a more developed character rather than
the one dimensional Han Sing.  And while I could figure out from the
beginning most of the twists and turns of the plot, I was distracted
during the movie trying to figure out each character's motives. 
Nevertheless, part of me was thrilled to witness part of cinematic
history: an implied relationship between an Asian and an African
American in a mainstream film.  A small step, and a flawed one at
that--because the film focuses primarily on kung fu instead of on this
relationship--but a step forward nonetheless.  And as a long time fan of
Jet Li's, I definitely enjoyed the part where he kicked everyone's ass. 
Less than three days later, I went back for a second helping -- and
found this time the plot became clearer, the funny moments funnier, and
the action scenes more compelling because I could savor each and every
move without trying to take in what was happening at the same time. 
Yeah, I'm a girl who likes good action flicks.  So sue me.  And people
wonder why I opted to see this instead of `Erin Brockovich.'  
        As elating as it was seeing Li and his team once again put on an
astonishing performance, and on the big screen no less (I grew up
watching Jet Li's movies on cable), as refreshing as it was witnessing
an amalgamation of two cultures (re: football and kung fu) ... I
sympathize with Li when he tells his fans that in this film he had no
real control over the creative process, and it shows.  `Romeo Must Die'
is a prime example of Hollywood's attempt at packaging and selling an
unfamiliar Asian legend to the mainstream audience, its attempt at
establishing the film career of a young recording artist.  It succeeds. 
Sacrificed, however, are character development, plot articulation, and
artistic restraint.  This film committed one of the seven deadly sins of
cinema (IMO, anyway): having a constant stream of background music to
speed up the pace.  I do like the music (having bought the soundtrack),
but there is no need to have it there eighty percent of the time.  Most
of the characters are cardboard cutout villains and turncoats, their
lines copied from God knows how many gangster movies before. 
Fortunately, Aaliyah has charm and cinematic presence enough to lend
believability to her role as Trish O'Dey, one of the more interesting in
the batch.  With time and improvement, I can definitely see her going
places with this acting business.  O'Dey's father Isaac is portrayed by
the stern and unrelenting Delroy Lindo, an example of excellent
casting.  I give the filmmakers credit for masking Li's deficient
language abilities by putting scenes together that highlight his boyish
charm and innocence in two clashing cultures.  He still seems most
comfortable speaking in his native language, and it is only during the
scenes with Han's father that his talent as an actor shines.  
        The plot is an interesting source of inner conflict for me.  During the
first viewing the little movie critic voice inside me kept piping up and
reminding me how linear and unsurprising the plot was, how predictable. 
Perhaps because during the second viewing I just sat back and said, `To
hell with it, I'll enjoy the movie,' the plot actually moved along at a
faster pace, and what was simplistic before took on a brand new twist. 
These are not the twists of, say, `Fight Club' caliber, but I do indeed
sense that the script tries to rise above its all-encompassing hit movie
packaging courtesy of Joel Silver.  Another point of debate is the
wonderful action sequences, though lacking the intensity of those from
`The Matrix,' which sometimes are so clearly staged that they distract
us from Han's supposed sense of purpose.  Again, the opponents are
portrayed as mindless dummies who would rather have Han take them out
one by one instead of, say, attacking him together all at once. 
However, I will not be one to complain about these flaws, since they are
common ailments of films of this genre.  Li's work is as exciting and
original as usual, and only slightly hindered by the Mortal Kombat music
(reminiscent of scenes from `The Matrix') and sometimes shaky camera
work.
        One thing I'd like to especially point out in favor of `Romeo': it is
not afraid to have emotional moments.  Most of these moments come from
the interaction between Li and Aaliyah who have surprising chemistry
together.  These are two earnest actors at work, and it shows.  My
favorite moments--the scene on the couch after Collin dies, the dancing
scene at the Casino--are a welcome respite from the tiresome `gangsters
cleaning up' sequences obliged to supply the plot's linearity in
between.  Trish's playfulness was a perfect compliment to Han's shyness
and determination.  It is a shame that they did not have a chance to
develop any sort of romance that was hinted of in the title, yet it is
oddly appropriate and refreshing at the same time.  Hint to filmmakers:
not every film has to have a romance.  These two would have made a good
couple, though.
        The last but most complex source of my ambivalent feelings toward the
film is its approach regarding the ethnicity issue.  Yes, it is elating
to see that this movie even got made, got released, won over some
audiences.  We've come a long way, baby.  It is saddening, however, as
my friend Heather mentions, that they needed an action flick to do so. 
I would like to see yet another attempt at tackling the race issue, but
in a more sober and more realistic film.  Preferably not gang related. 
Thankfully, however, `Romeo' was gracefully free of many stereotypes
that plague other films of the same type.  This made up for a lot.  I am
partial indeed.
        I think you might have sensed a trend in my review thus far.  Watching
`Romeo' was a constant psychological tug-o-war for me.  On one hand I
bought two tickets to watch the film produced by `the producers of The
Matrix,' to watch them break down the race barrier a little bit; most
of all I bought tickets to watch Jet Li kick ass.  I did not expect to
be touched by a platonic relationship of the most wonderful and
tantalizing kind, I did not expect a smarter gangster movie than `Rush
Hour.' Like `Romeo,' I was hopelessly conflicted.  It's a film that
almost achieves memorability yet fails because it is inevitably
Hollywood in its gunpowder, war, and backstabbing betrayals.  Somehow I
think the film is stuck in this grey area because it can't go either way
without becoming something else entirely.  Jet Li's charm and agility
almost achieve their full potential but do not, because Li and his team
have not quite seemed to click with American production sensibilities. 
`Romeo' is enjoyable, but it might leave idealists and die-hard Li fans
like myself with a lingering sense of disappointment.  Why am I
disappointed?  That elusive fact is what I've spent this entire
reviewing trying but failing to discover.  This movie's rating is what I
felt it deserved yet I hate to bestow because I needed to latch on to
something much more significant in this film, and because Jet Li always
lights up every movie he's in.
Rating: B- (First viewing, 3/31/00; Second viewing, 4/3/00)

Title
Review for Notting Hill (1999)
Coincidentally, this key phrase in the movie also sums up the entire
film.  The whole thing seems like a surreal dream.  A nice, surreal
dream (has the horse been beaten enough yet?).  Let's face it, the
plot is ludicrous.  Almost as ludicrous, as, say, a prostitute falling
in love with her client.  Not that there is anything wrong with that.
In a season dominated by FX-laden blockbusters like Episode I, `The
Mummy,' and `The Matrix,' `Notting Hill' will provide a
welcome escape into fairy tale romance that the inner girl (okay,
inner boy too) in us all craves.  It's a movie for everyone
who's ever been starstruck.
Despite its overall success, the film is uneven at places.  From the
very beginning, awkward editing and abuse of rock music (a sadly
common event in the MTV era) threaten to eclipse the atmosphere, but
eventually the film picks up its own lighthearted yet slightly
bittersweet pace.  The selected soundtrack hits and misses, and the
score is often too cutesy and recycled (not only so, but cued at
similar scenes), but at dramatic intervals the swelling music is quite
effective.  The movie moves along at a fairly brisk place, but it does
not escape lagging in a few places (discussed later).  The romance
between Anna and William seems forced at first because of the very
rapidity with which it develops, but this becomes more acceptable as
we grow accustomed to the film's wonderland atmosphere.
While it *is* a romantic comedy (let's make that Comedy with a
capital C), it does not reduce secondary characters into
two-dimensional cardboard; rather, it puts them into good use.  Each
secondary character, from leading man William Thacker's (what, is
this supposed to allude to Will M. Thackeray?) (played by Hugh Grant)
eccentric circle of family and friends to Alec Baldwin's suprising
cameo as Roberts' insensitive boyfriend, has an interesting
characteristic of his own.  A standout is Thacker's grossly (and I
mean that literally) inapproriate roommate spike, whose idiosyncracies
bring comic relief in a bold way (read my lips: butt cheeks) that not
many romantic comedies of this sort dare do.  Another form of humor I
rather appreciated were the industry in-jokes (Harrison Ford, Mel
Gibson, Demi Moore).  Sadly, they could've used this form of humor
in many other places and given the film a real punch.
`Notting Hill' brings back the Julia Roberts of `Pretty
Woman': the pretty girl with the big grin and infectious laugh.
Roberts has never been an exceptional actress, but she's more than
perfect (and just a bit self deprecating) in her role as mega movie
star Anna Scott.  Glamorous and graceful when she's in the movie
star mode, Roberts also effectively morphs into the girl-next-door
mode that was her claim to fame in `Pretty Woman' and subsequent
films.  What's interesting about the casting of Roberts is the
apparent parallels between Roberts and the character she plays and
Roberts' willingness to poke fun at this structure.  Roberts and
Scott both became famous at a young age, both are under intense public
scrutiny whenever they do something as mundane as hold hands with a
boyfriend.  The irony comes when we see the (un)intentional parallels.
Scott describes herself as a bad actress with a pretty face that
everyone will forget ten years from now, just as critics everywhere
love to proclaim Roberts as just another long-legged beauty who
can't act.  Well I'll give her this: she does a great job of
acting like a bad actress in the pseudo-film clips.
Speaking of self-deprecation, we come to the master himself, Hugh
Grant, most known for `Four Weddings and a Funeral,' Elizabeth
Hurley, and the Divine Brown scandal.  Here again we have evidence of
masterful casting.  While Grant may look perpetually lost in other
films, his shy boy stuttering comedy and unaffected charm is perfect
for his role as the everyday man William Thacker.  There's even a
sly reference to his scandal thrown in:
Part of what makes the film different is its poignancy amidst the
lovey-dovey stuff and comedy.  There's just a subtle hint of the
common man versus the unreachable: in this case, the common citizen
versus Hollywood superstar.  Thacker's group often gets together
and laments about their lives, envious of Anna and treating her like a
walking Madonna, try desperately to impress her; while Anna in reality
lead a glamorous but lonely life in the spotlight.  Because of the
similarities between Roberts and Anna, we feel as if we've been
given a secret peek into Roberts' private life.  It shows the
sometimes inhumane treatment most celebrities have to endure.  Its
ingenuity is it simultaneously makes fun of the celebrities'
complaints by placing their troubles alongside a woman bound to a
wheelchair for life, a failed entrepreneur, a fired stockbroker, a
romantic failure, and starving refugees.
The film would have been immensely better if it had been, say, half an
hour shorter; toward the end you keep thinking it's going to end,
but it just keeps dragging on (the Death Flaw for romantic movies, in
my opinion).  It is times like these when the quiet, snippy, decidedly
British banter between the characters seem lifeless and forced.  Other
times they are witty and engaging.  I suppose this is worth it in a
way since it all builds up to a wonderfully fluffy happy ending that
is bound to send sensitive viewers everywhere looking for their
hankies and Kleenexes.  `Notting' made me laugh *and* cry; it
entertained me but it didn't try too hard to be sweet and
cute. There's no better way to spend a Friday evening.
Silver-Screen List Administrator and PVPHS Class of '99
http://members.aol.com/saitiau/welcome.html

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
"Mission to Mars" is one of those annoying movies where, in the middle
of the movie, you get the sneaking suspicion that the reason the
trailer looks so good is because they showcased ALL the best parts of
the movie: all five minutes of it.  "Mission" *does* give you payoff;
but when it does come, it's too little, too late.
"Mission" has some good ideas, but they get lost in the unbearably
boring delivery, dime-a-dozen dialogue, and spate of good actors
wasted in cardboard-cutout roles.  I'm sure the director and writers
were very proud of each Hallmark moment they came up with, so they
stretch each dramatic moment out like silly putty until it loses all
its charm.  Glances don't communicate any deeper emotions just because
you draw them out for five hours on end.  The film spends an hour on
this kind of stuff, building to its climax.  A lot of it is a cliched
glorification of family relationships, marriage, friendship, unite we
stand divided we fall kind of crap.  There are some spectacular
special effects sequences in this film, and I give it points for
trying to stay true to the science I know (trying is the key word
here).  The sequence with the Martian demonstrating their history is
oddly beautiful and touching, but as mentioned by then we're so sick
of the goddamn thing we want the movie to be over.  Great design, good
intentions, but no cigar.  If you're not a die hard sci-fi, FX or
Jerry O'Connell fan (his character is the only one who has some
semblance of character), don't waste your eight bucks on this.
And what the hell, Tim Robbins died halfway through the movie, in a
STUPID way too.  That's just unforgiveable.

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
The Blair Witch Project was overhyped.
And like most overhyped films, it was a major disappointment for me.
It was praised as the scariest movie to be made since "The Shining" or
"Halloween" or whatever, yadda yadda yadda, but in the end it was just
a justifiably glorified experiment in independent film
making. Creative?  Yes.  Well-acted? Yes.  Laudable?  That too.  But
scary? No.  Not in the way it promised to be.  It might be more
appropriate for viewing at a quiet, private gathering in your home,
rather than with a bunch of rowdy movie- goers who are just waiting to
be scared.
I have to admit, the first five minutes really hooked me, because this
was the first time we've actually seen movie actors look really crappy
(i.e., realistic) on screen.  No, I'm joking, but the point is we
don't usually see character exposition like this, from the third
person narrative to the first person, from hand-held video camera
(documentary of the film makers themselves) to the actual
black-and-white documentary of "The Blair Witch." It was like watching
a family video on screen, it was an unprecedented blurring of the line
between reality and fiction.  Even the taglines for the film were
cagey: they left people wondering whether this film that they were
going to see was a real documentary, a fake one, a film containing
documentary footage, or a documentary containing film footage.  Yes,
you would be as confused as I were, unless you're one of those people
who read up everything you could on this film and was prepared, sort
of.  Not even "The Real World" or "Cops" achieved this kind of
reality, which makes it all the more amazing because "Blair" is
actually fictitious.  I must marvel at the lengths the film makers had
to have gone though to accomplish this feat . . . but did we *really*
need to see an hour and a half of it before getting to the point?  We
knew these people were going to die, we knew that this time, the good
guys weren't going to survive.  The suspense just didn't work anymore
when everyone was waiting to see how these characters would die.
"Blair" tried to make the supposed witch scary by having her described
by commonfolk, by I think this was the witch's undoing.  These people
were too matter-of-fact; they spoke of the legends as if they were
like any other small town stories.  A hairy old woman with a shawl?
Whatever.  And why did kill?  That was never explained either.  The
pile of rocks, the man-shaped twigs, the goo on Josh's "stuff." None
of these were explained.  If there were any scary images being
conjured up in my head, they were pretty much diffused by the frequent
switches between daylight and night time and the non-stop bickering
between the characters, yeah, it's hilarious, and definitely much
better than seeing people screaming their heads off and spouting off
stupid lines, but it ruins the mood.  The passionate will cry that we
are all spoiled by special effects, that we need artificiality and
contrivance to scare us.  At this point I'm afraid that I must concede
their statements to be at least partially true.  Who wants reality
when we can experience it first-hand?
It's a pity, really.  If only the rest of the film were more like the
last five or ten minutes: the desperate, haunting, and truly unnerving
end to our three (or the two left) intrepid documentators.  To me,
that was the film's saving grace.  If not for the ending (which gave
me major chills when later that night I had to be alone in a big
house: I kept imagining shadowy figures facing the corners of the
walls), I would've walked off with a far worse impression of "Blair."
I'm fond of it, and I admire it, but I wish it had lived up to
expectations.  The truth is I now see this film as an aborted genius,
a glimpse at what might have been a true milestone in the horror
genre.

Title
Review for Prince of Egypt, The (1998)
"And Moses stretched out his hand over the sea; and the Lord caused the
sea to go back by a strong east wind all that night, and made the sea dry
land, and the waters were divided." -- Exodus 14:21
        It's one thing reading the Exodus chapter in a church, in a retreat, in
a classroom, or even seeing the old black and white version on TV.  It's
another *seeing* Moses take his staff, raise his eyes towards the sky, and
part the ocean.  In the DreamWorks cartoon adaptation of possibly the
most famous story of all, image is the emphasis and they do a darn good
job of emphasizing it.  For believers, this film will be a major spiritual
experience; for nonbelievers (like me), it will be two hours of magic and
jaw-dropping awe.  Suffice to say that for at least two hours, I almost
became a believer.
        As I said, the film's strong point is its animation.  You probably
already know that from the previews alone.  There are amazing sequences
in the film: as the Hebrews are passing through the wall of water on the
Red Sea, we briefly catch a glimpse of a whale behind the wall of
aquablue.  During one spectacular dream sequence, Moses dreams that he's
trapped in the walls of the castle, that he became one of the Egyptian
figures on the wall.   Guards chase him from corner to corner, from pillar
to pillar.  And one of my favorite scenes from the movie: when God sends a
plague to Egypt.  It originates as a sort of mini-galaxy in the sky, the
ghostly white tendrils dancing eerily across the pitch-black sky, winding
their way through town, deftly avoiding houses with the mark of lamb's
blood.  It's graceful, haunting, and solemn at the same time.  It's quiet, but
the kind of quiet we see in those shots of Paris we get before the city
gets blown up in "Armageddon."   I especially admire the way they drew
the water in this movie: from the gentle river little Moses is first placed
in, to the river that Moses/God turns into blood, to the dividing Red Sea. 
The light, too.  The light Moses is bathed in when he sees the burning bush,
the aforementioned eery whiteness of the plague.  Of course, overall the
artwork is just amazing.   I liked how they weren't trying to be too
"Disney," adding too many funny creatures.  But then again, this is a
different kind of story.  Not only was the art itself stunning, you've got to
give the director (or animator?) credit for arranging the objects to give
them symbolic meaning, sometimes obvious and sometimes not so obvious.
        Having said that the art is the movie's strong point, I'll have to say
that aside from the "Deliver Me" tune and much-better-than-radio-version
"When You Believe" (gracefully weaved together at the end of the movie),
most of the other song numbers don't fit in too well for me.  "You're
Playing w/ the Big Guys Now" just doesn't seem appropriate here.  This is
not another "Hercules." The score was pretty good most of the time: it
worked best when it was quiet, some of the dramatic moments were a
little distracting.  To me, it had a chant-like feel to it that is very similar
to the score of "The Lion King."  The voices were okay -- they weren't
distracting, and that's a good thing.  Val Kilmer did a great job as
Moses/God; I didn't even know that was him until later.  In fact, the only
voice I could recognize was Jeff Goldblum's, if only because he has just a
distinctive way of speaking and I've see way too many iMac commercials.  
        "The Prince of Egypt" is a film for adults and children alike
(possibly more for adults).  Whether you're a believer or not, you'll be
touched by the story of the people of Moses striving for freedom and
clinging steadfastedly to one single beliefe: that their God will come
through.  I don't know, sometimes I feel that religion causes nothing but
trouble in this world; hence if there are more films like this one that
reminds us of what's ultimately good and true in the teachings of religion
(i.e., the faith it instills in its believers), they are perfectly welcome in
an age where most of us are morely likely to scoff at the devoutly
religious.  What's wrong with believing in miracles?
"It is not the noise of the shout of victory, Nor the noise of the cry of
defeat, But the sound of singing I hear." -- Exodus 32:18
Rating: B+ (First viewing, 12/23/98)
* Is it just me, or do the mountains of Midian look kind of like the
mountains of Paramount Pictures? (Which wouldn't make sense at all,
since this isn't a Paramount Pictures film. . . )

Title
Review for Double Jeopardy (1999)
That is, unless you're one of those people who have seen the preview a
thousand times on TV or in the theaters.  I can tell you one thing
now: they gave the entire movie away.  Why someone would want to base
an entire movie on one premise and then give that crucial detail away
in the trailers is beyond me.  However, if they *hadn't* given it
away, the film would've still been suprisingly devoid of suspense
given its subject matter.  Obviously, the producers thought they could
remake "The Deep End of the Ocean," throw in Tommy Lee Jones and a
couple of cliches and call it an action drama.
"Double Jeopardy" offers solid acting from Ashley Judd and Tommy Lee
Jones, who got first billing even though he didn't see to be on screen
half as much as Judd did.  It also offers some genuinely funny,
clever, or full-of-tension moments (my favorite: Judd waking up in the
coffin), but none of that can salvage the film from its insanely
predictable plot.  Half the time I'm wondering whether I'm watching
one of those overhyped TV miniseries, which always turn out to be less
exciting than advertised.  Judging by the beginning, end, and a huge
chunk of the middle, I might have been watching a special Hallmark
presentation too.  The movie's stretching for an almost two hour long
film with only 30 minutes worth of material.  Implausible material, no
less.  Loose interpretation of one of the amendments aside, too many
times in the movie I thought, "That is *not* possible*." That kind of
stuff is excusable in popcorn movies, but not one like "Double
Jeopardy" that tries to pass itself off as serious drama.  Everything
seems dragged out, overplayed.  When they should've kept us in the
dark, they let the cat out of the bag too early.

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
"To deny our own impulses is to deny the very thing that makes us human."
Amidst all the sappy romantic comedies that have come out on the
heels of spring, "The Matrix" is like a taste of what is to come, a prequel
to The Prequel, so to speak.  Not that the Matrix is like any of the
jingoistic summer blockbusters, but it's been a welcome relief for my
thriller-craving movie-goer heart.
The concept of the Matrix isn't all that new. It's been appearing in
all but hordes of movies recently: "The Truman Show" (albeit a movie of a
very different genre), "Dark City," and even in the trailer that preceded
the movie itself: "The Thirteenth Floor." It's that we as human beings are
part of a plan (usually set up by computers, and in this case machines),
that we are being "experimented on" (in this case enslaved) by something
we remain ignorant of.  When this concept is explored in sci-fi, good sci-
fi, like "Dark City" and this particular movie, it always makes me shudder
because it's just something so intangible, so fantastical, and so unknown
to the human mind.  Questioning reality (a tagline for "13th Floor,"
coincidentally).  
So, while it isn't groundbreaking in the screenwriting aspects, the
real treat is in the execution.  Absolutely brilliant effects, and solid work
in the art direction (kudos to the ultra-cool costumes--well, that's what
they all look like, but still) and cinematography.  I said "solid." I felt that
it could have been a bit more innovative and different, given the subject
matter it's dealing with.  And yet we've gotten competent work, with the
set constantly bathed in a green and black gloom.  Hell, even the sunlight
looks dark, if you know what I mean.  Especially harrowing is the scene
where Neo wakes up in his gelatinous bed among the whole "crop"; also,
the scene where the phone's ringing, a train is thundering by, and Trinity's
about to declare her love for Neo.   I'd like the sound effects to earn some
recognition come Academy Awards time next year but a) it's still a year
away b) more competition has yet to come c) this is sci-fi.  The action
sequences were directed with a John Woo-ish edge, and thanks to the "if I
believe it it's true" theory they're hawking in the film, they had a lot of
freedom when it came to the special effects.  Bullets stopping midair,
morphing men, raining bullets, and did I mention bullets?  
The story moved along at breakneck speed most of the time, so that I
rarely had a chance to catch my breathe before something stunning or
unexpected or humorous happened (yes, it's got some tongue-in-cheek
humor).  I'm still trying to figure out some points in the plot, and while it
was not without holes, I'm glad that it gave us something to think about
and that it was much improved over Keanu's last sci-fi outing.  Speaking
of Keanu (aka Neo), I can't think of anyone who was more perfectly cast. 
He's no master thespian, but he's the epitome of cool, and he has this
gaunt, bewildered, yet determined look around him that makes him so
perfect for this thriller.  And yes, I did think he did a competent job
(whoever does his makeup, however, needs to lay off on the red). 
Lawrence Fishburne (sp?) was haunting as Morphius, and he and Keanu had
some wonderfully spooky scenes together.  It's odd that this isn't really a
horror film, but I felt terrified at times.   I was not particularly satisfied
with Carrie-Anne Moss's (aka Trinity) performance, but she has the right
look.   And this *is* a movie where looks matter.  Excellent casting for
the Agents--they look like the high school teachers from hell.  
The Oracle, however, completely stole the movie.  She was well-cast
as well and it is oddly fitting that in the apocalyptic world the human
race's guide would appear to be something as mundane as a psychic palm
reader who bakes chocolate chip cookies.  The whole scene that took place
in her apartment brought a bittersweet feel that not many sci-fi flicks
achieve.  The way you kinda feel like when you go back in time and see a
dead relative still alive.  It's the same reason, I guess, why they made
something as commonplace as picking up the phone a matter of life and
death.  In a way it makes sense, since the Internet has become the primary
way most modern human beings communicate.  
On a deeper level the movie, like most good sci-fi, makes us think. 
Granted that the ending was more clear-cut and "happy" than some films
like "Dark City" (in the end, it is love that brings Neo back to life--Neo is
The One because Trinity and Morphius believed in him, causing him to
finally believe in himself), and there are some things that are never
explained--like what exactly is the Oracle, how it came to exist, who are
the Agents, and how Neo came to be aware of Morphius and the Matrix (or
are these just things I have to think about more?)--but it still leaves us
with interesting ideas, metaphysical (for example, the idea that
"supernatural" phenomena can occur *when* we suspend our disbeliefs)
and scientific (what we perceive *is* based on nothing more than
electronic impulses, after all) and such time-honored questions as what
makes us human and what makes humanity worth it. That's what you get
*in addition to* the shoot-outs!   
Three cheers for this smart sci-fi thriller.   
"How about I give you my finger, and you give me my phone call?"
*YKYAXPW (You Know You're An X-Phile When) . . . "Artificial Intelligence"
brings to mind the William Gibson (scribe of "Johnny Mnemonic,"
coincidentally) episode of the X-Files ("Kill Switch"), where wonder-hack
Esther Nairn is reunited with her lover only in the "AI."
* I liked how Morphius gave Neo (or Thomas Anderson as he was back then)
directions on his cellphone: "Go to the window.  Open it." Sounded like a
good ol' text-based RPG didn't it?  
* Wooooo, I'm glad BuzzCut!Keanu is back!  (So says a Supposed Former
Keanu Junkie . . . Hey, I went to a Dogstar concert, damnit! ;)
* It intrigues me how the sets are uniformly grim and dirty in sci-fi
thrillers.  I'd like to design a set for once where it's so goddamn happy it's
depressing.         
* YKYAXPW . . . The morphing Agent reminds you of the shape-shifting
Bounty Hunter from the X-Files.  Even their facial structures are similar.   
* I sure got a headache after seeing all those people getting slammed into
the wall and other hard surfaces.  OUCH!
* YKYAXPW . . . Wait, I thought The One was Cassandra Spender? 
Silver-Screen List Administrator and PVPHS Class of '99
http://members.aol.com/saitiau/welcome.html

Title
Review for Home Fries (1998)
        I'll admit that what made me go see "Home Fries," an eccentric
romantic comedy that looked suspiciously like the gazillions of other
eccentric romantic comedies that have come out in the past five years,
was the name Vince Gilligan.  The man behind many of the greatest X-Files
episodes, a man known for his knack at combining humour with great
dialogue and in-depth looks at the Mulder/Scully relationship.  Quite
honestly, after viewing "Home Fries," I felt that the film was suspiciously
like the gazillions of other eccentric romantic comedies that have come
out in the past five years.  Suffice to say that I was disappointed, but not
really.  For what did I expect of Vince?  He got is start in 45 minute
episodic television.  In retrospect, this episode was exactly like some of
the episodes he's written: crazy, romantic, eery, right down to the
goofball murders and wacky townsfolk.  If I had looked really closely, I
might have seen some of the genius Vince has in writing about the sincere
and the genuine, the Southern Boy that he is.   Or it might just be a
figment of my biased imagination.  
        As much as I appreciate the morbid sense of humor the film has,
there's something that just feels not quite right about things.  Am I too
conservative, or does the romance between Dorian (Luke Wilson aka
Sheriff "Bad Blood") and Sally (Drew Barrymore) seem utterly contrived
and unconvincing?  Granted that it's a wacky world, but the way the script
was written it seems that those two fell in love because of a *La Maz
class*.  Not that I don't believe in rapidly developing romance, but not
under these circumstances, which are a little TOO morbid.  They're asking
us to suspend all sympathy we might have for a human being, and they
want us to believe in the "long shot romance."  I wish I had seen enough
movies or remembered as much so that I might cite a movie as a counter-
reference.  You never quite understand what the deal is with Dorian's
dysfunctional family, except that they're murderous and simple-minded. 
Hilarity ensues, romance develops, Sally and Dorian live happily ever
after.  Shot of cute baby.  Awww.  Add some moody songs and Addams
Family-ish score and you get your average ERC (Eccentric Romantic
Comedy).  Drew Barrymore is charming as Sally, if only because Sally is
simple, down-to-earth, not that hard to portray if you have a smile as
innocent and sweet as Drew's.  The same goes for Luke Wilson, whose job
is to look like the nice and sweet Southern Boy that he is.  An admirable,
entertaining effort by Vince Gilligan (and the other folks -- yes, I know
other people made this movie too ), but one that looks suspiciously like
your run-of-the-mill...  well, you get the gist.
Rating: C+  (First viewing, 11/28/98)

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
"Star Wars Episode I: The Phantom Menace" Review
by Fontaine Lien
More reviews: http://members.aol.com/saitiau/cinema.html
(SPOILERS.  SOME YOU'VE HEARD ABOUT, SOME YOU PROBABLY HAVEN'T.)
**This review is dedicated to Lori "McGregor," who yelled "SEXY!!"
whenever Obi-Wan appeared on-screen.**
Imagine someone who's never seen or heard about Star Wars before
coming up to you and asking you what "Phantom Menace" was about and
what kind of movie it was like.  It would mostly likely be difficult to
describe creature fighting with atomic gumballs, a little boy who is
allowed to race "pods" at hundreds of miles per hour, and villains who are
never entirely introduced without some misgivings.  But this is "The
Phantom Menace," the prequel sequel to what is perhaps the most
successful science fiction franchise in the history of the western
hemisphere.  This is LucasFilms moviemaking, where they rely on
mindboggling effects, breathtaking graphics, and moviegoers' partiality to
win the hearts.  
This comes from me, X-Phile extraordinaire who has never been
especially inebriated by the Star Wars phenomenon.  I am no "Star Wars
groupie," as a friend attempted to label me a few days ago.   I have no
Skywalker or Han Solo action figures.  I never dressed up as Princess Leia
during Halloween.  I never _wanted_ to be Princess Leia.  I don't own the
trilogy.  I don't _remember_ most of the trilogy.  I did not see "Phantom
Menace" the first day it came out.   But nonetheless, the characters in
Star Wars has become as familiar to me as they have become to the
millions of Star Wars fans out there.  R2D2, C3PO, ewoks, Yoda, Obi-Wan,
Darth Vader, Jabba the Hut.  Oft-used terminology.  To sum it all up, I find
it extremely difficult not to extol this movie with high enthusiasm and let
that be the end of it.   
The idea that the "complete" story will be told in three sequels is
enticing, ingenious, but unfortunately, the integrity of "Phantom" was
sacrificed because of the same reason.  Those of you who were under the
delusion that we would find out how little Anakin becomes evil will be
disappointed.  Most of the characters were given little treatment, with
the primary focus being in Anakin.  At the end of the movie, we know
little about Qui Gon Jinn, Obi-Wan, or even Queen Amidala (except that she
is an extremely dedicated queen.) These are all characters that I would've
liked to spent more time with.  Darth Maul, who makes an interesting
villain, only appeared when he was required to look intimidating or to be
the enemy of the good forces.  He makes an appearance in only two to three
fantastic "duels" but is killed off too swiftly, too easily.  Goodbye,
painted face.  The primary villain in the movie is thus wasted.  The
federation, it seems, is entirely subject to the control of the hooded
hologram, and the hologram's purpose remains unknown (a story to be told
in Episode II, I suppose.)
Most of the action scenes are filled with typical Lucasian
improbabilities.  The Naboo troops never seem to take aim when they fire,
and yet they rarely suffer even a bruise.  The ultimate improbability
comes when the movie pulls an Independence Day -- oh no, we can't
disable their shields, here comes little Anakin who can do it just be flying
into the ships interior and flying randomly, thus enabling a swift victory
on ground.  Of course I realize that all of these events are essential for
the movie to continue, and they weren't quite so annoying given the
context.  This is Star Wars, after all.  The cheesy dialogue is no rumor,
folks; it seems great directors are incapable of writing sensible dialogue
(see Chris Carter's monologues or James Cameron's "Titanic.") Any angst I
felt during the Anakin/mom parting scene dissipated with the soap opera-
ish writing.  In contrast, the Qui Gon Jinn death scene was more effective
because it had more matter, and less art.   Again, the cheesiness seems
oddly in place in the scheme of things.  Nobody goes to this movie
expecting "The English Patient."
Most annoying character of the year goes to--yep, you guessed it--
Jar-Jar.  He is comical, yes, maybe even funny (though I find most of the
humor forced), if he hadn't been used so much and if his jokes were more
aptly-placed.  Portman, McGregor and Neeson were all reasonably
satisfying in their roles: Portman successfully portrayed the different
qualities of the queen all-dolled up, the decoy queen, and the gentle
"handmaiden" queen.   She looked for all the world a 14 year-old teenager
forced to take on the responsibilities of a planet yet strong enough to
shoulder it.  Neeson was also convincing as the wise Jedi Knight, and his
"moves" were none too shabby for a man his age; McGregor was often
reduced to saying "Yes, master," but when the occasion called for it he put
an admirable amount of intensity into Obiwan Kenobi, foreshadowing the
future that is to come.  All three were aptly cast.  Jake Lloyd is extremely
adorable, but sometimes the artificiality of his acting comes through; but
I suppose that's okay, because 12 year-olds don't have a tremendous
degree of depth anyhow.  In any case he compensates with his innocence
and charm, which is all the more poignant given the fact that Anakin turns
into the monstrous Darth Vader.  Most of the other minor characters (for
example, Anakin's mother and the captain), however, seemed lifeless. 
I think most will agree that the most successful element of the film
was its graphics and effects.  Lucas combined his powerful vision with
state-of-the-art technology and the best artists in the trade to produce a
world more breathtaking than even the previous Star Wars trilogy. 
Tattooine excites a degree of nostalgia; and the underwater city, the
Capitol, and the Naboo city are all works of arts on their own.  Each city
offers its share of curious creatures: the amphibians, the oddballs at the
Tattooine marketplace, the creatures of the Jedi Council (I especially got
a kick out of Mr. Conehead).  The dress and language seem to be successful
combinations of different world cultures -- I did not have a big problem
with the accents as others do.  I think it is mere coincidence that many of
the creatures ended up sounding like some ethnic groups on this planet. 
After all, if an actor is to emulate an accent, he's got to model it after
something he knows.   It just goes to show the diversity that exists in the
Star Wars universe.  Some people also find the CGI art to be to unrealistic,
but this also wasn't a problem with me -- this is a fantasy, and how can
you make a fantasy world look realistic?  It would take away the surreal
quality of it.  
While I am mindful of the flaws this film has (plot,
characterization, acting), I admit that for the most part they went
unnoticed during the 2 hours and some minutes I was in the theater
(except Jar Jar -- you just *can't* tune him out).  I was simply too much
in awe that I was watching Star Wars, that I had a chance to participate in
this even like my parent's generation had been able to do with the first
three Star Wars movies.  Seeing Portman and Mcgregor I couldn't but see
shades of young Hamill, Harrison, and Fisher.  However, I am not saying the
flaws are excusable; I make no attempt to disguise the fact that I am
extremely biased when it comes to Star Wars.  It's Star Wars.  Basically it
comes down to this: if you are as enchanted with the universe that Lucas
singlehandedly created as I am, you will enjoy this film; if you go in as a
casual viewer, you'd enjoy the film as well; but if you watch the movie as
a critic, you probably won't enjoy the movie.  I say let go for a while.  Let
the force take over for a bit.
(I will say that again and again, and I am sure its meaning will not
escape anyone who is in tune with pop culture to any extent.  When you see
the movie in this light, it becomes not just a movie but part of a whole, an
event that symbolizes the creation of an entire new world.  A continuation
(precursor?) of the saga.  A chance for two generations to connect in the
collective worship of a phenomenon.  As mentioned in the beginning, this
film relies heavily on the success of its predecessors to engage the
audience and to make them care for its characters.  I'd say, for me at
least, that they've succeeded.  I think I've found the ideal fantasy heros
for my generation.)
It's light and magic, sound and effects, heroes and princesses,
science fiction and drama, the allegorical good and evil.  And y'know?  It's
funny how, in the end, no matter what misgivings and cynicism I might
have had about the film, it all added up to one neat little ball of elation
and belief.  
*Tip I got from somebody: Stay till the end of the credits.  You'll get a
"surprise" (or more like a foreshadowing).
*The federation aliens look a lot like the "little green men" we are so
familiar with today.
*Thanks to Catherine for the "amphibians" idea, and Spero for the
character names.  

Title
Review for Perfect Murder, A (1998)
        "A Perfect Murder" is a great thrill for
weekend get-together nights.  It's got
everything a suspense thriller needs: suspense
(duh), atmosphere, and *believable*
characters.  Michael Douglas seems apt at
playing lonely millionaires, and Gwyneth
Paltrow once again masters the role of the
vulnerable wife.  One thing I found interesting
about this movie is that it's not really a
"whodunnit" in the sense that we know from
the start who the murderer is.  It's the why
and how that keeps us on the edge of our
seats.  Throughout the movie there's an
atmosphere of loneliness and perverted
sentiments that works really well in the plot.
The bathing scene reminded me of "Psycho,"
and I thought it was a nice touch at the end
with Paltrow's character (and us)
experiencing a sense of deja vu when we
revisit the apartment.  Towards the end,
however, it's clear what the only menacing
factor is that's left, so the only excitement
left for us is seeing how the couple will
resolve their, ah, differences.   Even though "A
Perfect Murder" lacks in some creativity, it
dots the I's and crosses the T's at what it's
trying to do, and does it well.
Rating:  B- (First viewing, 10/29/98)
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for Scream 3 (2000)
"Scream 3" Review
by Fontaine Lien
(Obviously, you shouldn't read this if you don't want to know whodunit.)
You gotta give Wes Craven, Kevin Williamson and co. credit for coming
up with the supposed end to a trilogy that was, while definitely not
as ingenious and surprising as the first installment, satisfying and
unexpectedly GOOD for a sequel.  Yes, when it comes to the end of a
trilogy, all bets are off, and the biggest anomaly of "Scream 3" is
perhaps that it, well, didn't suck.
If seen purely as a stand-alone film, "Scream 3" leaves much to be
desired; but as the movie keeps telling us over and over again, it's
not meant to be seen as just another movie.  It's the conclusion to a
trilogy.  It's "Scream" . . . its third time over.  It would be unfair
to judge the film without keeping this fact in mind.  Already, when
"Scream 2" appeared in theaters, many fans and critics felt the
haunting effects of the Munch mask diminish.  The sequel seemed to
develop its story much the same way the original had.  The same goes
for "Scream 3": the formula that went from "Scream" to "Scream 2"
appears again (although in hindsight, "Scream 2" was much more
formulaic); the upside?  Much of the first two films' tongue-in-cheek
humor, in jokes, and genuine slasher fun was retained.  I'm glad that
this is the last; I'm surprised the writers were able to stretch the
original plot so far and give it a completely new twist.  They're
testing the limits here.  Another sequel, and I'm afraid they'll reach
the boundaries of our willingness to suspend disbelief.
Once again, the setting is set in a movie inside a movie, much like
"Scream 2." Hmmm, I wonder if the set "Sunrise Studios" used for "Stab
3" was reconstructed from the original "Scream" set?  Lots of the fun
comes from the jokes and in jokes about Hollywood (Jennifer Aniston,
anyone?), and much of the intrigue comes from, yep, the unreality
within reality.  Munch (henceforward my term for the masked and
identity as yet unrevealed killer) and Sidney (Neve Campbell)
reconstruct the chase from "Scream"; it's reality, but at the same
time it isn't -- Sidney opens a door only to find herself in the
middle of the air.  It's not Woodsboro, but Hollywood Woodsboro.  The
Scream movies have always been as much about parodying and paying
tribute to the industry, especially the horror film genre, as they
were about scaring us.  Think of "Scream 3" as the biggest laugh of
them all.  "Scream" threw in a movie geek and self- conscious
references to the genre; "Scream 2" put cinema and "reality" side by
side; "Scream 3" takes all these elements, juxtaposes, superimposes,
and turns things completely around on us.  In the end, the killer
doesn't have superhuman powers after all as the rules predict; in the
Wes Craven tradition he is a member of the family gone awry, a bad
seed.  Roman (Scott Foley) wanted to direct his life's own movie, but
he was unconscious that it was but a mockery of modern horror films,
where villains never survive.  I must admit, they kept me guessing on
this one.  Was it Sid who, finally driven to the edge of insanity,
went on a killing spree in a fit of schizophrenic madness?  Was it
Sid's father?  Was it Detective Kincaid, with a morbid fascination for
Hollywood?  Or was it Milton, the man who knew the most about Maureen
Prescott's mysterious past?  I liked the element of unpredictability
in the trilogy's final installment, even if at the end my reaction was
equal amazement and incredulity.
I liked how Craven kept doing what he did best in the previous films:
keeping things scary while adding a dash of Hollywood make believe
here and there.  I was amused by the guest appearances: Lance "Frank
Black" Henriksen unwisely cast as a sleazy Hollywood producer (come on
guys, the man exudes authority and intelligence), Carrie Fisher, chick
from "Now and Again" and "Welcome to the Dollhouse," and Jamie Kennedy
as our beloved video store film expert Randy.  Campbell, Arquette,
and, well, Arquette all return as our favorite heroes, while Scott
Foley plays a decidedly un-Noel like character with surprising
success.  The actors who portrayed the actors in "Stab 3" were also
smart in playing the characters as caricatures of, well, themselves.
I loved the frantic pace of the chases, even though we pretty much
know the formula already: dead, dead, dead, dead, dead, Sidney saves
the day.  Craven's direction kept things interesting.  No, the Munch
mask isn't as scary anymore, but it was well compensated by atmosphere
(empty sets, replicas of murder scenes), direction, and movement.  And
even though we could tell to a certain degree that some characters
were doomed, the when and how kept us in suspense.
As I've said, I think this is the limit the writers can go without
making things look ludicrous.  They'll be hard-pressed to come up with
something that'll explain THIS next time.  The killer was a bit TOO
superhuman this time.  Even with the two of em in "Scream" the killer
couldn't get from point A to point B so quickly and effortlessly.  I
also could have done without the hokey "come to mother" ghost scares.
So as much as I love being scared, I say let's keep the case closed on
Sidney Prescott.
* What's up with that trailer, "Ready to Rumble"?  Rose McGowan as David
Arquette's love interest?  Sorry, but I still think of them as brother
and sister after "Scream." Ew.
* Seems they can't get enough of that ubiquitous Nick Cave song.

Title
Review for Return to Me (2000)
After having heard so many critics describe "Return to Me" as an
old-fashioned Hollywood romance, I kept asking myself going into this
movie: What exactly is an old-fashioned Hollywood romance?  What made
"Return to Me" old-fashioned and old-Hollywood?  Was it the tunes from
Sinatra, etc., legendary singers the senior citizens in the film
constantly harp on?  Was it the glamorous, sophisticated feel?  The
charisma of the two leads?  Even now I can't say that I have gotten
any closer to the real answer, because I haven't see that many
old-fashioned Hollywood romances.  I don't think any of the romances
I've seen have been classified as such.  Which leaves me the option of
vaguely agreeing with my fellow critics -- "Return to Me" was
old-fashioned in the sense that it reminded me of the way the younger
generation perceive venerated old Hollywood magic, the way I perceive
cinnamon spice and apple cider.  It was traditional, magical.  We knew
it couldn't be too daring, or have any surprising plot twists that
many cynical modern romances are apt to throw in.  It was a romance
told with such endearing simplicity, tenderness, and love (from
director Bonnie Hunt) that it couldn't help but sparkle with charm
despite its shortcomings.
The film owes a lot of what it has to Bonnie Hunt's direction.  From
the very first bird's eye view of Chicago, zooming in slowly toward
the insignificant Bob Rueland (David Duchovny), accompanied by the
"Return to Me" ballad (by whom?), we can tell we're in for something
sweet.  The scenes between the characters are endearing, truthful,
with just a hint of fantasy.  Real people don't act that way; real
people aren't that nice.  We know all this, and yet we want to believe
in these folks' existence.  The premise itself seems to have sprung
out of a fairytale, but Hunt's rooting the fairytale in common Chicago
folk simultaneously lends credit to the scenario and tinges everyday
urban life with a hint of the ethereal.  Everything is ordinary--yet
beautiful--in this film.  >From the festive little family restaurant
to Grace (Minnie Driver) and Bob's wardrobes.  From the eloquent,
not-in-a-hurry to progress storyline to the dainty watercolors that
Grace paints.  From the animal stars to the way all the characters
interact on screen -- the most beautiful part.  "Return to Me" has
done an excellent job of assembling together a group of actors who
blend in effortlessly as a family: the audience has no trouble at all
believing that this rambunctious family actually does exist.  We care
for them, laugh with them, cry with them; we're concerned that the
little boy will pick up cursing from his father. Whatever Hunt did,
she brought out the naturalism in all of the actors.
Disappointingly, David Alan Grier's Charlie, however much I like him,
was the most flatly-written.  Duchovny here does a laudable job of
shaking off his Fox Mulder persona -- with the help of his fellow
co-stars rarely do we see any hint of Special Agent Fox Mulder.
Instead we have a normal guy who when he falls in love shows more
delight than Fox Mulder will show over the span of an entire season of
"The X-Files." Duchovny, who is excellent at understatement and
self-deprecation as an actor showcases his considerable comedic talent
on screen.  Minnie Driver is engaging as always as the sweet, innocent
Grace with nothing but a good heart to offer.  Though an unlikely
pair, Duchovny and Driver gradually warm up to each other as the movie
progresses.
While "Return to Me" functions remarkably as a laugh-out-loud comedy,
a romantic scenic tour through Chicago, and a tearjerker, the story is
set up so the film ends up having nowhere to develop.  The entire
climax of the film hinges on when and how Grace is going to tell Bob
that she actually was the recipient of his wife's heart.  We already
know that there's going to be a happy ending; we feel like we spend
the entire film, however enjoyably, in a straight line going towards
that point.  As a result Bob and Grace click almost too quickly--yes,
I know she's supposed to have his ex-wife's heart and everything--it
seems too effortless.  The main subject is a love story, and the
family scenes I love so much unfortunately are overused and distract
from the turmoil of the two main characters (whose story might not
have that much meat after all).  However, in the spirit of "Return to
Me," it won't do to be too picky about how "old" Hollywood tells its
stories.  I loved knowing that this was a labor of love for Bonnie
Hunt.  It shows.  The bottom line: "Return to Me" is nothing
remarkable, and yet its sweetness, sincerity, and charm might touch
your heart in ways that you hadn't imagined.

Title
Review for World Is Not Enough, The (1999)
Welcome to the world of Bond, James Bond; where the women are
beautiful, the scenery is dazzling, the bad guys are stupid, the jokes
are corny, BMW hawks its newest Beamer like a maniac, and where James
Bond continues to elude the AIDS virus despite his philandering (the
SNL skit doesn't seem all that unlikely right now).
Perhaps I am doing the series a disservice because I haven't seen the
older films.  This is only the second James Bond film I've seen, and
already this latest MGM offering seems eerily similar to "Tomorrow
Never Dies" in structure, characters, and dialogue.  I wonder if all
of them are like this?  Save for a couple of minor differences,
"TWINE"is all I expected it to be based on my viewing of "TND."
While I've always been a fan of the series' stylish, computer
generated opening sequences accompanied by a Bondish theme song, I've
gotta ask: "What were they THINKING?" Though by the end of the film I
realized what the black gooey substance was, that was still pretty
disturbing to watch.  The background images were seemingly taken from
any graphic designers' stock of ready-made patterns.
The plot was all right, designed more for capitalizing on the studio's
special effects budget than for winning an award in script-writing, of
course.  I've gotta admit though, I liked the twist in the middle of
the movie, even though many must have seen it coming.  It was great to
see a Bond girl as not just the victim of the archetype villain, but a
better and even more wicked and coldblooded manipulator.  I'm glad
Sophie Marceau has taken the role of Elektra King; I was getting sick
of seeing her in the gentle, meek, porcelain doll roles.  She has
disarming features, which makes her particularly effective in the role
of the villain.  I also enjoyed Robert "Full Monty" Carlyle as the
"other" villain; though they were pretty vague about his motives.
Yes, in typical Bond fashion, substance was sacrificed for style.  I
won't go on about this because I'm sure you are all familiar with
their way of filmmaking.  Okay, let's insert this gadget here because
it looks cool on screen.  All right, lets make Pierce do this and do
that for God knows what reason because that would make for a great
action sequence.  Bullet in the medulla makes one grow stronger?  Must
be a new medical technique invented by the oh-so-convincing *Doctor*
Christmas Jones.  Science is made to look ridiculous.  And please, for
the next movie lets not have the characters dropping puns all over the
place?  It gets old.  Fast.  The action scenes seemed frivolous and
farfetched, but what the hell, they looked cool.  Especially that
beautiful mountain they skied on.  Could've just borrowed one of those
cool snowmobiles huh?  One of the things I like about these movies --
the exotic locales.
I've never liked Denise Richards (Christmas Jones).  TWINE only
further solidifies my opinion of her as a pouty-lipped bad actress.
Nuclear physicist?  Yeah, that's REALLY believable. Just hearing her
deliver her lines made me want to puke.  Put some punch into it, girl!
She and Pierce had absolutely no chemistry together.  But then again,
James Bond sleeps with anyone, chemistry or no chemistry :-)
A couple of standouts that I really enjoyed, though . . . The
expansion of the role of M, done wonderfully by Judi Dench.  In TWINE,
she emerges as not only Bond's supervisor but a much more dynamic and
complex character.  Dench brings to M a dignity befitting her age and
position (perhaps it has to do with Dench's really status in life.)
Kudos to the scene on the dock.  On one hand we've got James Bond
manipulating his slick car, but I'm glad we also got a glimpse of what
the other characters were doing.  In too many incidents we see the
main character dealing with a dangerous situation, and later we see
him meet up with his buddies without knowing how his buddies escaped.
Many might think the worst of "TWINE." And yes, it does have flaws,
but I suppose I was happy with what I saw because I didn't expect
anything else. Perhaps they're churning out these movies according to
a set formula because this is what people have come to associate with
the 007 series.  A story involving lots of money, a freakish villain,
a femme fatale, cool gadgets and killer stunts.  Naked women prancing
across the screen in the opening sequence.  Cheesy and fraught with
impossibilities, yes; but that is the moral of the story.  I expected
James Bond and nothing else, and I was reasonably happy.
*Female Fashion Instinct: Nice gown Elektra wore to the Casino.

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
"Fight Club" Review
by Fontaine Lien
WARNING: You do NOT want to know the ending to this movie.  Stop reading
NOW if you have NOT seen the movie yet!
Wow.  Just when I thought all hope was lost for the fall movie season of
1999 (well, I had high hopes for "American Beauty" but my stupid friend
ruined my plans by telling me the ending).  "Fight Club" is a stylish,
testosterone-charged look at the mind of a man gone haywire, complete
with thought-provoking commentaries on modern society.  I'm more
appreciative now than ever that the folks who made the trailer did not
leave any hints as to what the movie was really about; it would have
ruined everything. 
It starts with an explosion of sound and neurotransmissions and leads
right into the conclusion of the film, like plunging us all into ice
cold water without forewarning.  Everything else is flashback from
there.  Without wasting any time at all we are introduced to the
character of Jack (Edward Norton), a white-collar yuppie slowly
wasting away due to insomnia.  We're drowning in his poetic narrative
and some of the best dialogue to come out of Brad Pitt in years.  The
scenes are like the ebb and flow of the tide; some are overwhelmingly
powerful and some seem to exist for none other than stylistic reasons.
Somehow I don't give a damn as long as Norton keeps talking and the
camera keeps doing that thing it does.  Shiftng out of focus and
shivering.  Freezing in place and moving abruptly forward.  The
"Matrix" and some other things.  For example, I love the shot in the
very beginning where camera moves down to the van parked in the
basement.  Impressive camerawork overall.  The all-out effects
delicately balanced out Norton's narrative, giving it just enough
oomph but not taking effect away from it.  I mentioned that Norton's
voice-over was like poetry; in fact the entire film is Homeresque in
its scale and beauty.  It's not afraid to do things that haven't been
done before, to laugh at itself with its twisted sense of humor (yes,
it *is* very funny).
Pitt and Norton prove a superb duo (in a movie that is all about the
interaction between Jack and Tyler); it's nice to see Pitt and Helena
Bonham Carter throw away their images and throw themselves into their
eccentric roles.  Norton, however, holds up the bulk of the movie and
proves that he earned that Oscar nomination.  If "The People vs. Larry
Flynt" and "Rounders" didn't make him a star, this movie will.  Don't
be fooled by Pitt's top billing.  It's all about Ed this time.
One friend, deceived by the film's title (as I was), claimed that if
he wanted to go see a film about men fighting, he'd see a Jean-Claude
Van Damme movie.  Well, as anyone who's see "Fight Club" can tell you;
the "Fight" has nothing to do with the theme, at least not directly.
Yes, there are a lot of fights, but all staged to illustrate a central
theme.  The beauty of "Fight Club" is when you look back, when the
movie is winding down to a halt, at everything that happened, you
realize that all parts coalasce to become a whole, and everything
clicks into place.  Without all of its individual parts the tale would
not be whole.  It's intriguing, and it makes you want to watch the
entire movie again just to see its genius and foreshadowing at work.
"The Sixth Sense," anyone (I haven't actually seen the movie yet, I
just read an article in Entertainment Weekly :)?  It's like one of
those riddles that give you a crime scene and ask you to find out how
the victim died.
I've heard the aforementioned EW doesn't like this movie.  They say
it's senselessly violent.  I think they're missing the point.  Yes,
there is a lot of violence in this movie, and I wouldn't recommend it
to young children; but is it senseless?  Is the movie rendered
pointless because in the end, we find out that Tyler never even
existed?  That he was just Jack's alter- ego in his fantasies?  Some
say by writing Jack into a lunatic you destroy the whole purpose of
the movie.  I say it only adds layers of meaning.  It's about a man's
struggle with his inner voice and his ideas that are being suffocated
by upper-middle-class monotony.  On the outside, his suits are crisp,
clean, white as snow; his behavior impeccable, his choice in furniture
excellent.  Inside, as the film shows us, he is turbulent.  And this
is where the violence comes in.  It is terrible, but it is definitely
not senseless.  It serves to illustrate a point, to develop Jack's
character.
I cannot help but wonder, however, if the film wouldn't be better if
it had just ended with Jack dying.  That ending would've felt more in
tune with the rest of the movie.  This one feels fine too; I couldn't
have asked for anything more beautiful and poignant.  Jack's still
screwed up, but he found someone just as screwed up as he is.  In the
end we're not only shaken by the look into our materalistic lives but
we've also gotten a haunting and penetrating look into the mind of an
"ordinary man."
* The only reason I didn't give the movie an A+ is because they blew up
Apple computers.  Hey, stop snickering!

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)
        "The Siege" is a hard-to-categorize film.   You can't say it's a
popcorn movie, because its special effects are actually a part of the plot: 
in other popcorn movies, the special effects IS the plot.  Doesn't quite
qualify as a detective movie either, since the detectives in the film spend
most of their time responding to incidents rather than investigating (with
the exception, of course, of the brilliant coup towards the end of the
movie); not an action movie either, because there's a lot less action going
on here than in the other action movies.  Of course Bruce Willis's
appearance and performance automatically disqualifies this film from
being Oscar-caliber drama (psychological, sociological, the whole deal). 
Rather, this film is a semi-successful melting pot of many of these
things.  There are some intense action scenes and some not-so-intense
ones; some scenes utterly devoid of meaning and some that cling to you
for a long while. 
        The film's strongest point is its shrewd tension buildup, something
you don't get that often in your everyday Jerry Bruckheimer film (I say
that having just seen "Enemy of the State").  There are some truly
surprising twists and turns, with the last one being the best, charged with
intense emotion.  That one second when you realize who Samir really is is
pure movie-going joy.  Another surprise that made me (and everyone else)
jump was the bus explosion.  Even it's inclusion in the trailors didn't
prepare me for the sudden explosion at a time of obvious tranquility and
compromise.  Well done, folks.
        There are some pretty strong performances in this film, the best
coming from Denzel Washington.  He really puts his heart into the
character Anthony Hubbard, giving him the desperation and the devotion to
make film work.  Annette Benning gives a strong performance (as
Sharon/Elise) as well, but I was even more impressed by the work of
seasoned actor Tony Shalhoub (Frank) who also appears in the upcoming "A
Civil Action" and has had a notable gueststarring role on The X-Files' "Soft
Light" episode.  He deftly portrays the man of ethnic minority who finds
the country he's loyal to suddenly turning against him--a sad story heard
too many times in the history of this nation.  If one thing ruined this film,
it was Bruce Willis's character Demereaux.  Although he must exist to
represent big government, Willis's performance did not make the character
come alive at all.  It is as if Willis, with his ubiquitous smirk, was guest-
starring as the Jackal.  Nothing new here.  His smirk (and lack of any other
facial expression) worked fine in movies like "Armageddon" (Hi, Jerry.),
but not here.
         The film is by no means perfect (boy have we heard that line enough
times ).  It starts off pretty slow, trudges along the way sometimes,
and falls prey haplessly to cinematic cliches occasionally.  That's unwise,
if it was a film not MEANT to have cliches.  A shame really, for a movie
that could have been really great, an "action" film that has something to
say, for once.  Nevertheless it presents some valid points, such as where
do we draw the line between upholding the absolute law and the taking
away of personal freedom and individual rights?  When is the government
too big for its own good?  And what will happen to democracy and the
voice of the people then?  A poignant question proposed in the film by
Washington: "[What if it weren't the Arabs?]  What it if were African-
Americans, Italians, Jews?"  What if it was any one of us?  "The Siege" is
not the sudden attack of sound and movement that its title suggests it is. 
It's a gradual infiltration of our mind, the gradual realization that there
just might be a chance that something horrifying might be happening to
this country.  This is a well-timed film in an era of paranoia, when
distrust of the military continues to mount; a good history lesson when Ex
parte Milligan  and the Reconstruction period are just pages in textbooks;
a film that doesn't aim for the pleasant experience but rather hits you in
the face with brutality.  Satisfactory, despite the Clinton jokes.
Rating:  B- (First viewing, 11/27/98)
* It's Not a Joke, Damnit - I'm tired of hearing villains uttering this line
in the face of obvious doom: "Is this some kind of a joke?"

Title
Review for Simply Irresistible (1999)
"Simply Irresistible" Review
by Fontaine Lien (saitiau@aol.com)
More Reviews: http://members.aol.com/saitiau/cinema.html
Okay, bear with me y'all, cause first off I have to get this off my chest:
WHAT THE HELL IS UP WITH THAT DAMN CRAB???
Whew.  Okay.  Cause that same clip shown over and over again was
beginning to get on my nerves towards the end, as cute as the crab maybe. 
Even I know that you need more footage than *that*.  And that wasn't the
only thing getting on my nerves.  The cutesy gimmicks, saccharine sweet
score / soundtrack and the pretty young faces of Sarah Michelle Gellar (as
Amanda) and Sean Patrick Flannery (as Tom) might have held some appeal
during, oh, say the first 10 minutes of the movie.  At first the movie
moves along at a quick, interesting pace.   It is speedily established that
something magical is about to happen to Amanda when she encounters a
totally random fairy godfather type person on the street, whose
aforementioned crab follows her everywhere and just *doesn't* die.  A
ridiculous concept, yes, but at this point I'm willing to accept it because
I'm willing to accept that this is how Amanda's life is changed, how her
powers are received.
Later on, the movie can't seem to decide whether these powers come from
this fairy godfather or from Amanda falling in with Tom. And this is why
the clips of the crab were annoying; they weren't just repetitive, they
were out of place and unnecessary.  The plot stumbles along at an uneven
speed, sometimes dwelling too long on a particular development (Amanda
suddenly becoming a great chef, her falling in love with Tom, etc.),
sometimes moving on too quickly for its own good.  Some places the plot
just doesn't make sense, sometimes it's way too contrived (the crab bit,
for example), and sometimes too corny (Peaches emitting dry ice.  Can't
beat that).  All in all the plot seemed fragmented, unconnected.  Not
romantic at all, and only funny in some places.  So, okay, do the magic
powers come from the crab?  Or the fairy godfather?  She can *float* now
too?  And all of a sudden, instead of just making dry ice come out of
peaches, she can put her emotions into her food?  Tom all of a sudden just
accepts Amanda's "witchcraft" in the end?  Would people really dine in a
restaurant that resembles life after death in Tupac's video?  WHAT THE
HELL IS UP WITH THAT DAMN CRAB?  It is unfortunate, because I liked the
basic premise of the movie, until it became too fantastical and tiresome. 
The film seemed to skirt around a serious theme or at least *a* theme for
a while, but towards the end it resolved to show us long flashback clips
and 5 minutes of people crying at their tables.  The humor was good in
some places (Nolan gets the funniest bits, including that
incomprehensible, totally random thing with the dolls).  Gellar and
Flannery are qualified actors, and Gellar has a particular charm, but I
much prefer her playing the saucy Buffy (or even Annette in the upcoming
"Cruel Intentions") than this sorry excuse for a character.  It's almost
funny sometimes to see these two trying so hard to make the dialogue
sound better than it is, or trying to make the relationship seem more
plausible.  The supporting character Nolan was a highlight, though he
reminded me a bit of Kevin in "You've Got Mail" (see footnotes).  And, as
always, typical of a chick flick / romantic comedy, there's a seemingly
endless romantic soundtrack in the background, cued up at all the right
places.   This sort of got on the nerves after a while, too.  
"Simply Irresistible" is not hard to understand, light, funny in some
places, and generally disappointing because it can't draw the line between
romance and protracted SAP, between humor and tired slapstick.  And how
could I refrain from making a pun? . . . "Simply Irresistible" is all too
easy to resist.
* Did anyone else think this was a tad bit similar to "You've Got Mail" (or
"The Shop Around the Corner")?  Business rivals fall in love.  Female
counterpart's business is in danger of being shut down.  Female as mother-
like figure guiding her.  The annoying, hysterical ex-girlfriends.
 * I _really_ like Sarah Michelle Gellar's wardrobe. 

Title
Review for War Zone, The (1999)
I remember three years ago, after seeing "Toy Story," I came out of
the theater mystified, a believer.  The film had managed to disarm my
natural defense against "animated movies" and capture my heart and
imagination.  Those of you who know me know I often cite Owen
Gleiberman's comment on "Toy Story" when describing a wonderful film:
"[It was] the art of dreaming when you're wild awake," or something like
that.  When I heard that a sequel was being planned, I was doubtful. 
After
all, how many *good* Hollywood sequels can you name?  "Speed II," "The
Lost World," "Lethal Weapon IV" certainly do not make the list.
I am overjoyed to report after three years, a high school diploma,
and numerous changes in life, I enjoyed "Toy Story 2" tremendously, if
not
more than the first one, and I trust that adults everywhere will enjoy
it
too.  An old recipe never fails; this time a good result has come out of
recycling old formats.  "Toy Story 2" features the same characters, the
same hilarity, the same bright picturesque scenery, even a similar
story. 
Tim Allen and Tom Hanks again bring their considerable voice talents to
the characters; Joan Cusack and Wayne Knight (why am I not surprised :)
also join the superb voice cast.  This time it is Buzz Lightyear who
rushes
to the rescue of Woody, the toys are in more danger and they face bigger
obstacles, such as a flyaway airplane instead of a runaway moving truck. 
But basically, the idea remained the same.  Toys should look out for
toys,
and there is nothing more precious than the bond toys share with their
owners.  Most of my favorite characters, including the T-rex, Mr. Potato
Head, Slinky, and the cute little aliens, returned; ingenious new
creations
also surfaced, such as Andy's pet puppy (which we only heard bark in the
original).   The film is eye candy itself, needless to say, and it's
like
putting on 3-D lenses and looking at the world.  Everything takes on
another dimension, bright dazzling colors and textures, and an ethereal
quality.  
I will not bore you with inane details, because anyone who has seen
"Toy Story" will understand how glad I am that the folks at Pixar stuck
to
what they excelled at instead of trying to introduce new gimmicks.  Yes,
I
could have done without the Star Wars references or the stock character
of Stinky Pete, but in general the film delighted and entertained.  
There is
nothing more joyous than being transported to another realm of complete
make-believe, non-stop action adventure, laughs, and artistic wizardry. 
Children love storytelling time, and apparently so do grown-ups like me. 
"Toy Story 3" or "The New Adventures of Buzz and Woody"?  I sure hope
so.
Rating: A- (First viewing, 11/25/99)

Title
Review for House on Haunted Hill (1999)
I had an epiphany today.  It occurred to me while I was watching
"House on Haunted Hill." It is as follows: If a trailer makes the film
it's advertising look like a trashy, stupid movie, well guess what?
Chances are, there *is* truth in advertising.
Too bad I didn't trust my own instincts when something-or-the-other
possessed me to see this movie.  I blame it on my sudden craving for a
scare and my anticipation of "Sleepy Hollow." That and "Dogma" started
too late in the afternoon for my schedule.  An hour of "Angel" or
"Buffy" is scarier than this doozy that tries to be scary and shtick
but falls flat on its face.  I wish I'd seen it when it was Halloween.
At least I would have been forgiving.  Hey, tis the season.
The movie was scary (albeit very confusing, dizzying, and nauseating)
at first, but soon the horror got repetitive and downright laughable
because the film obviously wasn't going anywhere.  Now I truly
appreciate films like "Scream," "Halloween," or any old Hitchcock film
where the scariness stems from situations that are at least somewhat
realistic.  That's what spooks people out, the fact that it could
happen to them or someone they know.  There has to be a logical
precedent for the situations they want to scare us with.  Sure,
utterly unpredictable is good, too, but that's different from utterly
nonsensical.  HOHH (House on Haunted Hill), on the other hand
. . . Well let's just say I about fell off my chair laughing when they
oh-so-cleverly revealed that everyone who got invited to the party was
related to the psycho doctors who died in the house a couple of
decades ago.  Riiiiight.  Y'know, that just sends chills down my
spine.  Yeah.  Just like I wet my pants when they told me THE HOUSE IS
EVIL.  Ooooooo.  Hint: blood and guts only work a few times.  Sooner
or later people start to tell themselves that it's just ketchup and
props and you've got to come up with something better than that.
There were just too many things in this movie that we've all seen
before; from the inevitable "plot developments" of strangers
unwittingly trapped together; strangers turning against each other;
the evil manifesting itself; the dead coming back for a last scare.
Each was more predictable than the last.  Why didn't these fools just
stay together in one place anyways?  Sheesh.  Was I grossed out?  Yes.
Did I get spooked a few times?  Yes.  But WHY?  I get really disturbed
when there is no why.  When there weren't random scares that were
there for no other reason than for the visual effect (which wasn't
that good either, trust me) and the scare, the film was filled with
drab, laughable dialogue.
The characters were incredibly flat and cliched.  Not to mention
downright annoying.  You've got a bunch of people going nowhere in
their lives; of course they're dumb enough to go to a party some
stranger invited them to provided they win a million dollars if they
survive the night.  Jeez, I thought no one fell for those "You may
already be a winner" things anymore.  And of course, all three gals
are babes.  I wonder how on earth the Geoffrey Rush of "Shine" ended
up in this movie.  Keep that up, Geoff, and you'll qualify for the
next Batman venture.  The only single person I enjoyed was Chris
Kattan because, well, he just cracks me up.  And Famke Jansen (sp?)
because she reminds me of the delectable Brosnan.  Pierce Brosnan
(hey, I willingly endured "Dante's Peak" three times for him :).
All right, I concede.  There were a couple of things I enjoyed.  That
perverted little amusement park at the beginning.  I probably won't
ride a rollercoaster for a while.  And the machine they used to drive
Geoffrey's character mad (see, I don't even remember their names).
The machine, not that stupid fishtank with naked wimmin in it.  I kept
waiting and waiting for that inevitable twist at the end of the movie.
It wouldn't have redeemed the film, but at least it would have made me
feel better.  But no, they opted for the beautiful sunrise ending.
Thank God they didn't add a kiss at the end or I would have puked.
God, there is no hope.

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
`Star Wars Episode I: The Phantom Menac' Review
by Fontaine L.
(SPOILERS.  SOME YOU'VE HEARD ABOUT, SOME YOU PROBABLY HAVEN'T.)
**This review is dedicated to Lori `McGregor,' who yelled `SEXY!!' whenever
Obi-Wan appeared on-screen.**
Imagine someone who's never seen or heard about Star Wars before coming up to
you and asking you what `Phantom Menace' was about and what kind of movie it
was like.  It would mostly likely be difficult to describe creature fighting
with atomic gumballs, a little boy who is allowed to race `pods' at hundreds of
miles per hour, and villains who are never entirely introduced without some
misgivings.  But this is `The Phantom Menace,' the prequel sequel to what is
perhaps the most successful science fiction franchise in the history of the
western hemisphere.  This is LucasFilms moviemaking, where they rely on
mindboggling effects, breathtaking graphics, and moviegoers' partiality to win
the hearts.  
This comes from me, X-Phile extraordinaire who has never been especially
inebriated by the Star Wars phenomenon.  I am no `Star Wars groupie,' as a
friend attempted to label me a few days ago.   I have no Skywalker or Han Solo
action figures.  I never dressed up as Princess Leia during Halloween.  I never
_wanted_ to be Princess Leia.  I don't own the trilogy.  I don't _remember_
most of the trilogy.  I did not see `Phantom Menace' the first day it came out.
  But nonetheless, the characters in Star Wars has become as familiar to me as
they have become to the millions of Star Wars fans out there.  R2D2, C3PO,
ewoks, Yoda, Obi-Wan, Darth Vader, Jabba the Hut.  Oft-used terminology.  To
sum it all up, I find it extremely difficult not to extol this movie with high
enthusiasm and let that be the end of it.   
The idea that the `complete' story will be told in three sequels is enticing,
ingenious, but unfortunately, the integrity of `Phantom' was sacrificed because
of the same reason.  Those of you who were under the delusion that we would
find out how little Anakin becomes evil will be disappointed.  Most of the
characters were given little treatment, with the primary focus being in Anakin.
 At the end of the movie, we know little about Qui Gon Jinn, Obi-Wan, or even
Queen Amidala (except that she is an extremely dedicated queen.) These are all
characters that I would've liked to spent more time with.  Darth Maul, who
makes an interesting villain, only appeared when he was required to look
intimidating or to be the enemy of the good forces.  He makes an appearance in
only two to three fantastic `duels' but is killed off too swiftly, too easily. 
Goodbye, painted face.  The primary villain in the movie is thus wasted.  The
federation, it seems, is entirely subject to the control of the hooded
hologram, and the hologram's purpose remains unknown (a story to be told in
Episode II, I suppose.)
Most of the action scenes are filled with typical Lucasian improbabilities. 
The Naboo troops never seem to take aim when they fire, and yet they rarely
suffer even a bruise.  The ultimate improbability comes when the movie pulls an
Independence Day -- oh no, we can't disable their shields, here comes little
Anakin who can do it just be flying into the ships interior and flying
randomly, thus enabling a swift victory on ground.  Of course I realize that
all of these events are essential for the movie to continue, and they weren't
quite so annoying given the context.  This is Star Wars, after all.  The cheesy
dialogue is no rumor, folks; it seems great directors are incapable of writing
sensible dialogue (see Chris Carter's monologues or James Cameron's `Titanic.')
Any angst I felt during the Anakin/mom parting scene dissipated with the soap
opera ish writing.  In contrast, the Qui Gon Jinn death scene was more
effective because it had more matter, and less art.   Again, the cheesiness
seems oddly in place in the scheme of things.  Nobody goes to this movie
expecting `The English Patient.'
Most annoying character of the year goes to--yep, you guessed it- Jar-Jar.  He
is comical, yes, maybe even funny (though I find most of the humor forced), if
he hadn't been used so much and if his jokes were more aptly-placed.  Portman,
McGregor and Neeson were all reasonably satisfying in their roles: Portman
successfully portrayed the different qualities of the queen all-dolled up, the
decoy queen, and the gentle `handmaiden' queen.   She looked for all the world
a 14 year-old teenager forced to take on the responsibilities of a planet yet
strong enough to shoulder it.  Neeson was also convincing as the wise Jedi
Knight, and his `moves' were none too shabby for a man his age; McGregor was
often reduced to saying `Yes, master,' but when the occasion called for it he
put an admirable amount of intensity into Obiwan Kenobi, foreshadowing the
future that is to come.  All three were aptly cast.  Jake Lloyd is extremely
adorable, but sometimes the artificiality of his acting comes through; but I
suppose that's okay, because 12 year-olds don't have a tremendous degree of
depth anyhow.  In any case he compensates with his innocence and charm, which
is all the more poignant given the fact that Anakin turns into the monstrous
Darth Vader.  Most of the other minor characters (for example, Anakin's mother
and the captain), however, seemed lifeless. 
I think most will agree that the most successful element of the film was its
graphics and effects.  Lucas combined his powerful vision with state-of-the-art
technology and the best artists in the trade to produce a world more
breathtaking than even the previous Star Wars trilogy.  Tattooine excites a
degree of nostalgia; and the underwater city, the Capitol, and the Naboo city
are all works of arts on their own.  Each city offers its share of curious
creatures: the amphibians, the oddballs at the Tattooine marketplace, the
creatures of the Jedi Council (I especially got a kick out of Mr. Conehead). 
The dress and language seem to be successful combinations of different world
cultures -- I did not have a big problem with the accents as others do.  I
think it is mere coincidence that many of the creatures ended up sounding like
some ethnic groups on this planet.  After all, if an actor is to emulate an
accent, he's got to model it after something he knows.   It just goes to show
the diversity that exists in the Star Wars universe.  Some people also find the
CGI art to be to unrealistic, but this also wasn't a problem with me -- this is
a fantasy, and how can you make a fantasy world look realistic?  It would take
away the surreal quality of it.  
While I am mindful of the flaws this film has (plot, characterization,
acting), I admit that for the most part they went unnoticed during the 2 hours
and some minutes I was in the theater (except Jar Jar -- you just *can't* tune
him out).  I was simply too much in awe that I was watching Star Wars, that I
had a chance to participate in this even like my parent's generation had been
able to do with the first three Star Wars movies.  Seeing Portman and Mcgregor
I couldn't but see shades of young Hamill, Harrison, and Fisher.  However, I am
not saying the flaws are excusable; I make no attempt to disguise the fact that
I am extremely biased when it comes to Star Wars.  It's Star Wars.  Basically
it comes down to this: if you are as enchanted with the universe that Lucas
singlehandedly created as I am, you will enjoy this film; if you go in as a
casual viewer, you'd enjoy the film as well; but if you watch the movie as a
critic, you probably won't enjoy the movie.  I say let go for a while.  Let the
force take over for a bit.
(I will say that again and again, and I am sure its meaning will not escape
anyone who is in tune with pop culture to any extent.  When you see the movie
in this light, it becomes not just a movie but part of a whole, an event that
symbolizes the creation of an entire new world.  A continuation (precursor?) of
the saga.  A chance for two generations to connect in the collective worship of
a phenomenon.  As mentioned in the beginning, this film relies heavily on the
success of its predecessors to engage the audience and to make them care for
its characters.  I'd say, for me at least, that they've succeeded.  I think
I've found the ideal fantasy heros for my generation.)
It's light and magic, sound and effects, heroes and princesses, science
fiction and drama, the allegorical good and evil.  And y'know?  It's funny how,
in the end, no matter what misgivings and cynicism I might have had about the
film, it all added up to one neat little ball of elation and belief.  
*Tip I got from somebody: Stay till the end of the credits.  You'll get a
`surprise' (or more like a foreshadowing).
*The federation aliens look a lot like the `little green men' we are so
familiar with today.
*Thanks to Catherine for the `amphibians' idea, and Spero for the character
names.  
Silver-Screen List Administrator and PVPHS Class of '99
http://members.aol.com/saitiau/welcome.html

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
Dialogue rehash:
"You're either incredibly smart or incredibly stupid."
        In this latest Jerry Bruckheimer/Touchstone Pictures offering,
Hollywood again repeats itself, but in a kickbutt fashion.  "Enemy of the
State," like any other Jerry Bruckheimer popcorn film, highly entertains. 
This one even more so because it capitalizes on the recent rise of paranoia
as seen on television's "The X-Files," silver screen's "Conspiracy Theory"
(note the plot similarities), "The Net," and "Most Wanted" (starring,
coincidentally, Jon Voight as the baddie).  I loved Gene Hackman as the
gruff, seasoned expert Brill (see Sean Connery in "The Rock") and Will
Smith as the reluctant hero Robert Dean (erm, see Nicholas Cage in "The
Rock").  The characters come to life in emotionally-powered scenes like
Smith's confrontation with Hackman in the elevator, Smith's fight with
Regina King (the wifey).  While the transition of Brill from antagonistic
and unsympathetic to reluctantly friendly paralleled Connery's character a
bit too much for my liking, I ended up rooting for the old man anyways. 
The only character I didn't like was Rachel Banks, partly because of the
way the actress played her.  She seemed too artificial, too forced.  Jon
Voight was convincing, way too convincing as the villain.  I think he should
quit playing these power-hungry high government officials for a while.
        Plotwise, the movie was actually okay.  The action was intense, not
too many plotholes, except having to listen to those two annoying tech
geeks spew off information we already have in a, well, nerdy manner.  For
example, "changing the configuration of Dean's packages" means "a bulge
appeared in Dean's packages."  That seemed dumb, but I assume the extra
dialogue was inserted to give the movie an extra anxiety-factor.  Like
many others I found the ending was the biggest copout, but gee I shouldn't
be surprised given the shootout at the end of "The Rock."  Scott Rosenberg
strikes again.  Despite losing points for lack of originality and "borrowing"
scenes, the tailor-made blockbuster "Enemy of the State" will definitely
satisfy your weekend craving for fast-paced action.  This is what
Bruckheimer does best, ain't it?
"Why are they putting things in my shoe?!"
Rating: B- (First viewing, 11/20/98)
* I'm amused how all the high-tech centers in movies look the same.  For
example, the NSA headquarters here looks a lot like Tommy Lee Jones's
office in "Volcano" and the MIB headquarters in "Men In Black."
* EE fans: didn't the cat and Brill remind you of the cat and Snow?

Title
Review for Mononoke Hime (1997)
I swear to you the fact that I saw this movie at its premiere and the
fact that I met my favorite actress, Gillian Anderson, at this
premiere really has nothing to do with me liking this movie.
My encounter with Gillian is a story for another place, but here I'm
going to tell you about "Princess Mononoke."  Actually, I don't even
remember a character in the story called Mononoke.  I guess I was too
distracted.
The gist is, I was a bit disappointed, because I am a big fan of This
Guy (I don't know his English name . . . he's the main artist and
creator of several popular anime flicks such as this one); but this
project did not exceed the quality of his previous works like "Totoro"
or "Grave of the Fireflies" (most of his films are wonderful, but for
your sake I suggest you visit IMDB instead of relying on my memory :)
It lacked delicacy and bittersweet qualities.  But, I think it is
proof of this film's merit that despite the fact that Gillian was
sitting only a few rows behind me, I was still held captivated by the
images and sound.
The sound.  The music was wonderful, alternating between the majestic,
the innocent, the humorous, and the tragic.  My favorite voiceover was
that of Claire Dane's.  True, everyone did a great job and you could
sense a lot of emotion (I don't know which one was Billy Crudup--I
assume it was the main character--or Jada Pinkett *Smith*) from each
character, but I'm sorry, was it necessary to give the monk a
hillbillie accent (courtesy of Billy Bob) or the Iron Fortress lady an
Irish accent (from Minnie Driver, of course)?  Gillian went all out,
but I just couldn't get used to the fact that it was Gillian's voice
behind that ferocious white wolf.  Yes, the fault is all mine.
The images were simply breathtaking, and I wouldn't expect any less
from this artist.  They need a little softening, but I'd take this
over a Disney toon any day (don't get me wrong, I loved "Mulan" :).
The plot was perhaps overly complex and resolved too quickly and
sloppily at the end.  The dialogue was poor, and they were hitting us
over the head with the "humans vs. nature" theme a bit too heavily (a
recurring theme throughout all the artist's previous films).  The
action was exaggerated, even for a cartoon.  But when I walked out of
the theater, I realized that I didn't care.  It didn't matter anymore
that I was disappointed; because in a way, I was satisfied.  It didn't
matter that I sat in the second row and my neck hurts like hell,
because I got the feeling I always get after watching one of this
guy's films (that by the way, I don't often feel after a Disney toon):
that there is beauty even in the tragic; that there is something
spiritual and unexplainable in the human soul and within the depths of
nature.
Rating: B+ (First viewing, 10/20/99)
*Watch for those tiny tree goblins.  They are *so* adorable.  They
look like tiny white aliens
*You want to hear about the premiere, you say?  Visit
http://www.geocities.com/area51/vault/3768/mononoke.html.

Title
Review for Psycho (1998)
        "Psycho" is cinematic storytelling at its best.  Suspenseful, scary,
and yet not over-the-top, it's what so many have strived to achieve and
yet faltered at.  With an unpredictable plot, unconventional
cinematography, a score that enhances and not interrupts, this just might
be the best movie of the year.    
        It's extremely hard to critique a film based *frame-by-frame* on a
classic.  The most one can do is judge the actresses, the actors, the
colors, the *subtlely* reorchestrated music.  But so what if all of these
are up to par, or even brilliantly done?  It's not a remake, it's a
multicolored and expensive duplicate.  At first I was afraid they'd meddle
with the script and destroy a classic; now I wish they'd at last gone and
done *that*.  At least then they'd get credit for being creative.  Now I
wonder why I paid money to go in the theater to watch a mildly
entertaining imitation rather than stayed at home and watched "Vertigo,"
or something.  I do not in any way claim to be a Hitchcock and/or "Psycho"
expert.  The only Hitchcock film I've seen *is* "Psycho," and that was two
years ago.  Anything else I know about Hitchcock I learned from "homages." 
However superficial my understanding of the original may be, I do know
that nothing much has changed except the actors.  Even the sets, the cars,
and the clothing seem to be stuck in the 1950s (except maybe Julianne
Moore's walkman).  
        I don't know if it was the black-and-white or the fact that I had
never seen the movie before, the first time I saw this movie it was much
more exciting.  Norman Bates's world seemed darker, drearier, gloomier. 
You could literally smell the "damp sheets" that he was describing.  Here,
Vince Vaughn's Norman Bates is well-acted, but he lacks the "look"
Anthony Perkins had.  Instead, this Bates is a little to amiable, too cute.
The same goes for Anne Heche (as Marion Crane), who puts up a good fight
but fails a just a little short of the duplicity, the fright, and the
helplessness Janet Leigh conveyed.  The shower scene would have been
more terrifying, given the bright red against stark white background and
more explicit shots, had we not experienced it before.  In short, the movie
was well done, but throughout the movie I couldn't help but ask Why and
What induced the producers to make an exact same movie.  I couldn't see
the point.  While those that haven't seen the original might find this movie
entertaining, the majority of us who *have* seen it fail to see purpose. 
When the initial thrill of seeing and hearing "Psycho" in full 90's
cinematic glory had worn off, the rest of the film became a parade of
dejavu that invoked a chuckle or two at some places, recognition and a
little fright at some others.  Gus Van Sant, a most admired director of
mine, is less of a director than script supervisor in this production.  Well,
at least they saved the screenwriter's salary.  
* The dates in the beginning are exactly the same as they were in the
original.  I think it's rather coincidental that this year, December the 11th
falls on, yes, a Friday.  
